New Mexico, session 2026, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico highlands university for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to construct a soccer field for the women's soccer team and for football field, track, natatorium and Gene Torres golf course improvements. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233542.1